Connecticut, session 2026, SB00379.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General
Assembly convened:
1 Section 1. (Effective from passage) The Board of Regents for Higher
2 Education shall conduct a study relating to workforce development
3 initiatives in the state. Not later than January 1, 2027, the board shall
4 submit a report, in accordance with the provisions of section 11-4a of the
5 general statutes, of the results of such study to the joint standing
6 committee of the General Assembly having cognizance of matters
7 relating to higher education and employment advancement.
This act shall take effect as follows and shall amend the following
sections:
Section 1 from passage New section
HED Joint Favorable
SB379 / File No. 176 1

SB379 File No. 176
The following Fiscal Impact Statement and Bill Analysis are prepared for the benefit of the members of
the General Assembly, solely for purposes of information, summarization and explanation and do not
represent the intent of the General Assembly or either chamber thereof for any purpose. In general,
fiscal impacts are based upon a variety of informational sources, including the analyst’s professional
knowledge. Whenever applicable, agency data is consulted as part of the analysis, however final
products do not necessarily reflect an assessment from any specific department.
OFA Fiscal Note
State Impact: None
Municipal Impact: None
Explanation
The bill has no fiscal impact. It requires the Connecticut State
Colleges and Universities (CSCU) to conduct a study regarding
workforce development initiatives in the state. It is anticipated that
CSCU has the resources to complete the study.
The Out Years
State Impact: None
Municipal Impact: None
SB379 / File No. 176 2

SB379 File No. 176
OLR Bill Analysis
SB 379
AN ACT CONCERNING WORKFORCE DEVELOPMENT IN THE
STATE.